Tennessee, session 114, SB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-203, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The net amount payable under any policy of life insurance or under any annuity
contract upon the life of any person made for the benefit of, or assigned to, the spouse
- 2 - 003107

or children, or dependent relatives of the persons, is exempt from all claims of the
creditors, including execution, attachment, seizure, and garnishment, of the person
arising out of or based upon any obligation created after January 1, 1932, whether or not
the right to change the named beneficiary is reserved by or permitted to that person.
Use of exempt funds does not change the classification of the funds used from exempt
to nonexempt.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 003107